Texas, session 892, HB269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter D, Chapter 771, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 771.080 to read as follows: Sec. 771.080.  EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM. (a) From money appropriated or otherwise available for that purpose, the commission shall establish and administer a grant program to assist nonprofit organizations, regional planning commissions, and emergency communication districts with providing emergency communications services, including 9-1-1 service, to end users in this state. (b)  The commission by rule shall: (1)  develop an application process for an entity applying for a grant under this section; (2)  develop eligibility and selection criteria for an entity applying for a grant under this section; (3)  develop procedures for commission approval of the use of grant money awarded under this section; and (4)  establish accountability controls for grant recipients to ensure the public purpose of providing emergency communications services is accomplished and this state receives a return benefit. (c)  In addition to money appropriated by the legislature, the commission may accept gifts, grants, or donations from any source to administer and finance the grant program established under this section. SECTION 2.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, the Commission on State Emergency Communications shall establish the emergency communications services grant program required by Section 771.080, Health and Safety Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.